Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-2004
Public Counsel; qualifications.

The Public Counsel shall be a person well equipped to analyze problems of law, administration, and public policy and during such person's term of office shall not be actively involved in partisan affairs. No person may serve as Public Counsel within two years of the last day on which such person served as a member of the Legislature or while such person is a candidate for or holds any other state office.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 3, p. 2879;

Laws 2020, LB1144, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,242;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 4.